Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1449.01
Committee; statement of organization; registration fee; failure to perfect filing; effect.

(1) At the time that each committee files its statement of organization pursuant to section 49-1449, the committee shall pay to the commission a registration fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The filing of a statement of organization is not perfected unless accompanied by the registration fee.

(2) A committee which has not perfected its filing of a statement of organization by the date due as specified in section 49-1449 shall not make or receive contributions or expenditures until such time as the filing of the statement of organization is perfected, except that:

(a) A committee may make an expenditure to pay the registration fee; and

(b) A committee may make expenditures for thirty days after the termination of its registration if the expenditures are part of the process of dissolving the committee and the committee dissolves within thirty days after the termination of its registration.

(3) The registration fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund.

Laws 2007, LB527, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 49.
July 18, 2026